Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1832.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9720.9. Sentencing for offenses committed while wearing mask.The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with section 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentence enhancement within the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing's guidelines for an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) when at the time of the offense the defendant was wearing a mask or other article of clothing or device with intent to conceal or attempt to conceal the defendant's identity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617